Utah statutes.
73-13-12.   Errors in copying for Section 73-13-10 -- As invalidating ratification.

Any error made, if any, in copying the original Compact in Section 73-13-10 hereof, shall be held not to invalidate the ratification of the Compact in any way.



No Change Since 1953

